Maine, session 132, LD1452.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §85, sub-§8, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 646, Pt. A,
§40, is amended to read:
8. Naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid overdose-reversing medication. An
emergency medical services person licensed under this chapter shall administer and
dispense naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid overdose-reversing medication in
compliance with protocols and training developed in accordance with this chapter. An
opioid overdose-reversing medication referenced in this subsection must be approved by
the federal Food and Drug Administration. Failure to comply with this subsection,
including any protocols or training requirements developed pursuant to this subsection, is
a civil violation for which a fine may be assessed in an amount not to exceed $1,000 per
violation.